Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-161
Cancellation of certificate of authority.

(RULLCA 807) To cancel
its certificate of authority to transact business in this state, a foreign
limited liability company must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing
a notice of cancellation stating the name of the company and that the company
desires to cancel its certificate of authority. The certificate is canceled
when the notice becomes effective.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 61.